Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 44 HAZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT
§ 39-4414. Remedies.

The remedies specified in this section are cumulative and nonexclusive.

MONETARY PENALTIES.

Any person who makes a false statement or representation in any application, label, manifest, record, report, permit or other document filed, maintained, or used for the purpose of complying with the provisions of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each separate violation or for each day of a continuing violation.

Any person who violates this chapter or any permit, standard, regulation, condition, requirement, compliance agreement, or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each separate violation or for each day of a continuing violation.

The imposition or computation of monetary penalties may take into account the seriousness of the violation, good faith efforts to comply with the law, and an enforceable commitment by the person against whom the penalty is directed to implement a supplemental environmental project. For purposes of this section, “supplemental environmental project” means a project which the person is not otherwise required to perform and which prevents pollution, reduces the amount of pollutants reaching the environment, contributes to public awareness of environmental matters, or enhances the quality of the environment. In evaluating a particular supplemental environmental project proposal, preference may be given to those projects with an environmental benefit, which relates to the violation or the objectives of the underlying statute which was violated, or which enhances the quality of the environment in the general geographic location where the violation occurred.

ASSESSMENT OF COSTS. Any person who violates this chapter or any permit, standard, regulation, condition, requirement, compliance agreement, or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this chapter may be assessed for:

The state’s costs for any nonroutine investigations, inspections, monitoring, or surveys which lead to evidence of the violation;

The state’s costs, including the reasonable value of attorneys’ services, for preparing and litigating the case;

The state’s costs for mitigating, removing, correcting or terminating adverse effects upon soil, air, or water quality resulting from the violation;

The state’s costs for impounding, storing, and disposing of contaminated property;

Compensation for damages to publicly held resources including but not limited to, land, water, recreational uses, wildlife, fish and aquatic life to restore the resource to its highest previous use;

Compensation for damages to privately held resources including, but not limited to, livestock, land, water, or other personal property, and compensation for court costs allowed by statute, reasonable attorney’s fees for trial preparation and trial of the case, and all other reasonable costs of trial preparation and trial of the case;

Compensation for damages to personal health and compensation for court costs allowed by statute, reasonable attorney’s fees for trial preparation and trial of the case, and all other reasonable costs of trial preparation and trial of the case;

The imposition or computation of costs may take into account the seriousness of the violation and good faith efforts to comply with the law.
(3) RESTRAINING ORDERS, INJUNCTIONS AND OTHER RELIEF.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any permit, standard, regulation, condition, requirement, compliance agreement, or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other relief deemed appropriate. Upon a showing to the court that a violation is causing an imminent hazard to the public health, the public safety, or to the environment, the department need not allege or prove at any stage of the proceeding that long-term irreparable damage will occur should the injunction or order not be issued or that the remedy at law is inadequate.

(b) A receiver may be appointed to oversee or operate any hazardous waste facility or site which is established or operated in violation of this chapter or any standard, regulation, condition, requirement, compliance agreement, or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

(4) PAYMENT TO HAZARDOUS WASTE EMERGENCY ACCOUNT. All moneys collected by the department pursuant to subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section to resolve any enforcement proceeding instituted under section 39-4413, Idaho Code, shall be paid into the hazardous waste emergency account created by section 39-4417, Idaho Code.

§ 39-4415. Violations constituting misdemeanors.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement or representation in any application, label, manifest, record, report, permit, or other document filed, maintained or used for the purpose of complying with the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or to imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year, or to both, for each separate violation or for each day of a continuing violation.

Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter or any permit, standard, regulation, condition, requirement, compliance agreement, or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or to imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year, or to both, for each separate violation or for each day of a continuing violation.

An action may be commenced and prosecuted by the attorney general. The director shall not be required to initiate or prosecute an administrative or civil action before the attorney general may commence and prosecute a criminal action.

§ 39-4416. Citizen suits.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who has been injured or damaged by an alleged violation of any permit, standard, regulation, condition, requirement, or order which has become effective pursuant to this chapter, may commence a civil action on that person’s own behalf against any person alleged to have committed the violation. A person commencing an action under this section shall be required to file a bond or equivalent security in an amount not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or in conformance with the requirements of rule 65(c) of the Idaho Rules of Civil Procedure if injunctive relief is sought.

No action may be commenced under subsection (1) of this section if the department has commenced and is diligently prosecuting an administrative, civil, or criminal action to require compliance with the law. Further, no action may be commenced under subsection (1) of this section unless the plaintiff has given the department sixty (60) days’ notice and substantial evidence of the violation upon which the citizens’ action is based. However, if the department commences an action in a court of the state of Idaho, any interested person may intervene as provided in rule 24(a) of the Idaho Rules of Civil Procedure.

In any action under this section, the department may intervene as a matter of right.

When issuing any final order in any action brought pursuant to this section, the court may award costs of litigation, including reasonable attorney and expert witness fees, to any prevailing party, whenever the court determines such an award is appropriate, except that the state of Idaho shall not be required to pay such costs in any citizen suit where the state has become a party.

Nothing in this section shall restrict any right which a person, or class of persons, may have under any other statute or the common law.

§ 39-4417. Hazardous waste emergency account.

There is hereby created an account in the state treasury to be designated the hazardous waste emergency account.

The account shall consist of moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature, moneys allotted to the account as a result of departmental compliance proceedings, moneys allotted to the account in a court ordered award or judgment, moneys allotted to the account in a court approved settlement, and moneys contributed to the account from other sources.

Moneys in the account may be used by the director in the case of a hazardous waste emergency to pay the necessary costs of preventing, neutralizing, or mitigating any threat to the public health or safety, or to the environment caused by that emergency.

The board may promulgate regulations for the withdrawal and use of funds from the account as specified in subsection (3) of this section.

All moneys placed in the account are hereby perpetually appropriated to the department for the purposes described in subsection (3) of this section. All expenditures from the account shall be paid out in warrants drawn by the state controller upon presentation of the proper vouchers.

Pending use, surplus moneys in the account shall be invested by the state treasurer in the same manner as provided under section 67-1210, Idaho Code. Interest earned on the investments shall be returned to the account.

§ 39-4417A. [Reserved.]

§ 39-4418. Local government notice.

A permit for a new hazardous waste land disposal facility or site shall not be issued until the department has given ninety (90) days’ notice to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the proposed facility or site is to be located.

§ 39-4419. Interstate cooperation.

The director shall have the power and the duty to encourage cooperative activities between the department and other states for the improved management of hazardous wastes, and so far as is practical, to provide for uniform state regulations and for interstate agreements relating to hazardous waste management. The state may enter into such agreements with other states to accomplish the purposes as set out in this chapter.

§ 39-4420. Employment security.

No employee of a hazardous waste generator, transporter or treatment, storage, or disposal facility or site shall be dismissed, suspended, or otherwise discriminated against because the employee testifies, provides information or otherwise assists in the enforcement or administration of the provisions of this chapter.

Any employer who knowingly violates the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be liable for damages, costs and attorneys’ fees, in addition to any other liability or relief authorized by this chapter, by any other statute, or by the common law.

§ 39-4421. Good samaritan protection.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no person who provides assistance or advice in mitigating or attempting to mitigate the effects of an actual or threatened leakage, seepage, or other release of hazardous waste, or in preventing, cleaning up, or disposing of or in attempting to prevent, clean up or dispose of any such leakage, seepage or other release, shall be subject to civil liabilities or penalties of any type.

The immunities provided in subsection (1) of this section above shall not apply to any person:

Whose act or omission caused in whole or in part such actual or threatened leakage, seepage or other release and who would otherwise be liable therefor; or

Who receives compensation other than reimbursement for out-of-pocket expenses for services in rendering such assistance or advice.

Nothing in section [subsection] (1) above shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the liability of any person for damages resulting from such person’s gross negligence, or from such person’s reckless, wanton, or intentional misconduct.

§ 39-4422. Severability.

The provisions of this act are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of remaining portions of this act.

§ 39-4423. Disposal of restricted hazardous wastes prohibited.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no person shall discharge, deposit, inject, dump, spill, leak, or place any restricted hazardous waste, as defined in section 39-4403, Idaho Code, into or on any land or water at a commercial hazardous waste facility or site.

The department may issue a variance from the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, if, in the judgment of the director, application of the requirements would cause undue hardship and the granting of the variance would not be harmful to the public interest or inconsistent with RCRA requirements. In issuing the variance, the director shall take into account:

The long-term uncertainties associated with land disposal;

The goal of managing hazardous waste in an appropriate manner in the first instance; and

The persistence, toxicity, mobility, and propensity to bioaccumulate of such hazardous wastes and their hazardous constituents.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations specifying those levels or methods of treatment, if any, which substantially diminish the toxicity of the waste or substantially reduce the likelihood of migration of hazardous constituents from the waste so that short-term and long-term threats to human health and the environment are minimized.
(3)(a) The board shall promulgate rules and regulations specifying those levels or methods of treatment, if any, which substantially diminish the toxicity of the waste or substantially reduce the likelihood of migration of hazardous constituents from the waste so that short-term and long-term threats to human health and the environment are minimized.

If such restricted hazardous waste has been treated to the level or by a method specified in regulations promulgated under this subsection, such waste or residue thereof shall not be subject to the prohibition in subsection (1) of this section and may be disposed of in a land disposal facility which meets the requirements of this chapter.

§ 39-4424. Disposal of manifested waste.

Manifested waste, as that term is defined in section 39-4403, Idaho Code, shall only be treated, stored or disposed of in this state at a permitted hazardous waste treatment, storage or disposal facility unless the burning of such manifested waste to produce heat is otherwise lawful.

§ 39-4425. [Reserved.]

The department of environmental quality shall assign a sufficient number of employees and equipment to inspect hazardous waste facilities or sites permitted under section 39-4409, Idaho Code, and located in Idaho where disposal of hazardous waste occurs for the purpose of assuring the protection of the health and safety of the public by monitoring the receipt and handling of hazardous wastes which have been transported by common carrier.

All employees of the department designated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall alert proper authorities or peace officers regarding violations pursuant to this chapter, violations pursuant to title 49, Idaho Code, and violations to any rules issued pursuant to section 67-2901A, Idaho Code.

All actions brought for violations of the provisions of this chapter or rules promulgated pursuant thereto shall be brought as provided for in this chapter. All actions brought for violations of the provisions of title 49, Idaho Code, shall be brought as provided in that title.

§ 39-4427. Commercial disposal fees.

There is imposed on the owner or operator of every commercial hazardous waste disposal facility or site permitted under section 39-4409, Idaho Code, the lowest applicable fee for each ton of waste or fraction thereof, as follows:

Thirty dollars ($30.00) per gate ton or fraction thereof for all hazardous wastes as defined by RCRA or section 39-4407, Idaho Code;

Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per gate ton or fraction thereof for all manifested wastes not otherwise defined in this subsection;

Two dollars ($2.00) per gate ton or fraction thereof for all manifested remediation wastes not otherwise defined in this subsection;

Twenty dollars ($20.00) per gate ton or fraction thereof for the first two thousand five hundred (2,500) gate tons or less of wastes received by a facility or site from the same site, property or hazardous waste management unit if the wastes: (i) are PCBs regulated under Idaho or federal law and are in concentrations greater than fifty (50) parts per million; (ii) are hazardous debris; (iii) are hazardous wastes that become subject to regulation solely as a result of a removal or remedial action taken in response to environmental contamination; or (iv) are hazardous wastes that result from corrective action or closure of a regulated or nonregulated hazardous waste management unit;

Ten dollars ($10.00) per gate ton or fraction thereof for all wastes contained in paragraph (d) of this subsection, if the wastes are received by the same facility or site and are from the same site, property or hazardous waste management unit in an amount greater than two thousand five hundred (2,500) gate tons up to twelve thousand five hundred (12,500) gate tons;

Five dollars ($5.00) per gate ton or fraction thereof for all wastes contained in paragraph (d) of this subsection, if the wastes are received by the same facility or site and are from the same site, property or hazardous waste management unit in an amount greater than twelve thousand five hundred (12,500) gate tons up to twenty-five thousand (25,000) gate tons;

Two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per gate ton or fraction thereof for all wastes contained in paragraph (d) of this subsection, if the wastes are received by the same facility or site and are from the same site, property or hazardous waste management unit in an amount greater than twenty-five thousand (25,000) gate tons;

Five dollars ($5.00) per gate ton or fraction thereof for all hazardous wastes that: (i) are delisted or treated so that the wastes are no longer hazardous wastes; or (ii) are nonhazardous radiologically contaminated wastes including materials from the “Formerly Utilized Sites Remedial Action Program (FUSRAP)” sites administered by the government of the United States; or (iii) are PCBs in concentrations less than fifty (50) parts per million and not otherwise regulated by Idaho or federal law; or (iv) are wastes not otherwise defined in this subsection.

The fees set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any of the following types of wastes:

Wastes generated or disposed of by a public agency or other person operating a household hazardous waste collection program;

Wastes generated or disposed of by any agency of the state of Idaho.

Any waste for which the fees are waived under the provisions of this section must be noted as fee-waived waste on the return required in section 39-4428, Idaho Code, and is subject to all audit provisions of section 39-4429, Idaho Code.
(3) For wastes disposed of by any agency of the state of Idaho at any commercial hazardous waste disposal facility or site permitted under section 39-4409, Idaho Code, the director, pursuant to a written agreement with the director, the owner or operator of any such facility or site, may credit on the return required in section 39-4428, Idaho Code, and in the fee remitted, an amount equal to the actual cost charged by such owner or operator per gate ton or fraction thereof for the characterization, collection, identification, transportation, treatment, storage and disposal of wastes at such facility or site.

§ 39-4427A. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-4427B — 39-4427D. Generator fees — Treatment, storage or disposal facility fee — Hazardous waste fees — Duplication. [Repealed.]

§ 39-4428. Collection of commercial disposal fees — Returns.

The fees imposed under section 39-4427, Idaho Code, shall be due and payable in monthly installments by the owner, agent, employee, or operator of such hazardous waste facility or site and remittance shall be made to the Idaho department of environmental quality on or before the fifteenth day of the month next succeeding the end of the monthly period in which the fee accrued. The owner, operator or designated employee or agent of the hazardous waste facility or site, on or before the fifteenth day of the month, shall make out a return, upon such forms setting forth such information as the department may require, showing the amount of the fee for which the owner or operator of the hazardous waste facility or site is liable for the preceding monthly period, and shall sign and transmit the same to the department, together with a remittance for such amount in the form required.

The department may relieve any person or class of persons from the obligation of filing monthly returns and may require the return to cover other reporting periods, but in no event shall returns be filed for a period greater than three (3) months.

§ 39-4429. Books and records to be preserved — Entry and inspection by department of environmental quality.

Every person or entity subject to the imposition of the fees specified in section 39-4427, Idaho Code, shall keep complete and accurate records, including itemized invoices and manifests for federally regulated types and quantities of hazardous waste ultimately disposed of at a hazardous waste facility or site in Idaho. All books, documents and papers, computer tapes, discs, and other records required to be kept by this section shall be preserved for a period of at least five (5) years from the date of the records or the date of the entries appearing in the records, unless the department in writing, authorized their destruction or disposal at an earlier date. For purposes of this chapter, at any time during usual business hours, the department or duly authorized agents or employees, may enter any place of business of the owner or operator of a hazardous waste facility or site where hazardous wastes are disposed and inspect the premises, the records required to be kept under this chapter, and the hazardous wastes or other chemicals contained therein, to determine whether or not all the applicable provisions of sections 39-4427 and 39-4428, Idaho Code, are being fully complied with. Trade secret information obtained by the department under the provisions of this section shall be treated in the same manner as such information obtained under section 39-4411, Idaho Code. If the department, or any of its authorized agents or employees is unreasonably denied free access or is unreasonably hindered or interfered with in making the examination of a hazardous waste facility or site, that hindrance or interference shall constitute grounds for suspension or revocation of the facility or site’s permit by the director of the department of environmental quality under subsection (b) [(A)(2)] of section 39-4413, Idaho Code.

§ 39-4430. Additions and penalties.

The additions, penalties, and requirements provided by the Idaho income tax act, sections 63-3046, 63-3075, 63-3076 and 63-3077, Idaho Code, as they now exist or as they may be subsequently amended, shall apply in the same manner and to the same extent to this act as to the Idaho income tax act and shall cover such additions, penalties and requirements and shall, for this purpose, be described and be for acts, omissions, delinquencies, and requirements under this chapter.

§ 39-4431. Collection and enforcement.

The collection and enforcement procedures available to the Idaho state tax commission provided by the Idaho income tax act, sections 63-3030A, 63-3038, 63-3039, 63-3040, 63-3042 through 63-3045A, 63-3047 through 63-3065A, 63-3068, 63-3071, 63-3072, 63-3073 and 63-3078, Idaho Code, as they now exist or as they may subsequently be amended, shall apply and be available to the department of environmental quality for the enforcement of the commercial disposal fee and for the assessment and collection of any amounts due thereunder. Said sections shall, for the aforementioned purposes, be considered part of this chapter and wherever liens or any other proceedings are defined as income tax liens or proceedings, they shall, when applied in enforcement or collection under this chapter, be described as commercial disposal fee liens and proceedings.

The department of environmental quality may be made a party defendant in any action at law or in equity by any person aggrieved by the unlawful seizure or sale of his property, or in any suit for refund or to recover an overpayment, but only the state of Idaho shall be responsible for any final judgment secured against the department of environmental quality and said judgment shall be paid or satisfied out of the general fund of the state.

§ 39-4432. Distribution of commercial disposal fee revenues.

The revenues received from the commercial disposal fees imposed by this chapter and any penalties, interest, or deficiency additions, shall be paid over to the state treasurer by the department to be distributed periodically but no less frequently than quarterly as follows:

An amount equal to ninety-five percent (95%) shall be remitted to the general fund of the state, which percentage shall be reduced to ninety-three percent (93%) in fiscal year 2013, to ninety-one percent (91%) in fiscal year 2014, to eighty-five percent (85%) in fiscal year 2015, and shall remain at eighty-five percent (85%) for each fiscal year thereafter; and

An amount equal to five percent (5%) shall be remitted to the county treasurer of the county where the activity occurred which caused the fees to be assessed pursuant to this chapter. Moneys returned to the county shall be utilized by the county to respond to health and environmental problems which may be caused by hazardous waste emergencies or spills, or improperly handled or packaged hazardous waste; and

An amount equal to one percent (1%) in fiscal year 2013, an amount equal to two percent (2%) in fiscal year 2014, and an amount equal to five percent (5%) in fiscal year 2015, and an amount equal to five percent (5%) for each fiscal year thereafter shall be remitted to the treasurer of a county highway district created pursuant to chapter 13, title 40, Idaho Code, to maintain a road under the jurisdiction of such district that connects a rail transfer facility to a commercial hazardous waste facility affiliated with such rail transfer facility. The use of the moneys provided for in this subsection shall be used only for the maintenance, construction and repair of the road described in this subsection; and

An amount equal to one percent (1%) in fiscal year 2013, an amount equal to two percent (2%) in fiscal year 2014, and an amount equal to five percent (5%) in fiscal year 2015, and an amount equal to five percent (5%) for each fiscal year thereafter shall be remitted to the state highway account established in section 40-702, Idaho Code, such amount to be utilized by the Idaho transportation department to maintain a road or roads under the state board of transportation’s jurisdiction that connects a rail transfer facility to a commercial hazardous waste facility affiliated with such rail transfer facility. The use of the moneys provided for in this subsection shall be used only for the maintenance, construction and repair of the road described in this subsection.

§ 39-4417B. Hazardous waste management account. [Repealed.]

§ 39-4426. Appointment of inspectors.

(b) “Facilities” or “facility” means a place, site or location or part thereof where swine are kept, handled, housed or otherwise maintained and includes, but is not limited to, buildings, lots, pens and animal waste management systems, and which has a one-time animal unit capacity of two thousand (2,000) or more animal units.